District of Columbia statutes.
21-901

Definition.

As used in this chapter, “mental illness” has the same meaning as that given to the term by section 21-501 .

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 763, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(d)(2), 59 DCR 5567

The 2012 amendment by Section 21(d)(1) of D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “Persons with Mental Illness” for “Mentally Ill Persons” in the chapter heading.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “mental illness” for “mentally ill person.”
1973 Ed., § 21-901.
1981 Ed., § 21-901.
U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia, civil jurisdiction, see § 11-501.
Superior of the District of Columbia, civil jurisdiction, see § 11-921.